Hawaii statutes.
§660-25 Notice to other parties, when.
If the person is detained on any process under which any other person has an
interest in the person's detention, and the other person or the other person's
attorney is within the State and can be notified without unreasonable delay,
the person detained shall not be discharged until the other person or the other
person's attorney has had an opportunity to be heard. [L 1870, c 32, §18; RL
1925, §2748; RL 1935, §4333; RL 1945, §10374; RL 1955, §239-25; HRS §660-25; am
L 1972, c 90, §5(p); am L 2016, c 55, §40]

Cross References

Notice of parole or release, see §706-670.5.

Victim or witness rights, see chapter 801D.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next